Wyoming, session 2025, HB0033.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-15-111 by creating a new
subsection (r) and 39-16-111 by creating a new subsection
(p) are amended to read:
39-15-111. Distribution.
(r) The funds collected and remitted to the
department under W.S. 39-15-107(b)(i) and (ii) for sales
taxes imposed under W.S. 39-15-104 and transferred under
W.S. 39-15-111(b)(i) and (ii) on sales of motor vehicles
and trailers during each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025
are appropriated annually to the highway fund for the
operation, maintenance, construction and reconstruction of
state highways. The department of revenue shall credit the
highway fund the specified amounts no later than ninety
(90) days after the end of the fiscal year.
39-16-111. Distribution.
(p) The funds collected and remitted to the
department under W.S. 39-16-107(b)(ii) and (iii) for use
taxes imposed under W.S. 39-16-104 and transferred under
W.S. 39-16-111(b)(i) and (ii) on sales of motor vehicles
and trailers during each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025
are appropriated annually to the highway fund for the
operation, maintenance, construction and reconstruction of
state highways. The department of revenue shall credit the
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0033
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
highway fund the specified amounts no later than ninety
(90) days after the end of the fiscal year.
Section 2. This act shall apply to motor vehicle and
trailer purchases made on and after July 1, 2025. This act
shall apply to sales and use taxes on sales of motor
vehicles and trailers paid on and after July 1, 2025.
Section 3.
(a) There is appropriated fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000.00) from the legislative stabilization reserve
account to the department of transportation for purposes of
repairing and maintaining tunnels on Wyoming interstate 80.
This appropriation shall be expended only to the extent
necessary after all other sources of available federal
funding are expended or as necessary to satisfy federal
matching fund requirements after available nonmatching
federal funds are expended. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning with the effective date of this act
and ending June 30, 2027. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert to the legislative stabilization
reserve account on June 30, 2027.
(b) Of the funds appropriated from the general fund
to the highway fund pursuant to section 1 of this act, the
first fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000.00), or as much
thereof as is necessary to equal the amount of funds
expended under subsection (a) of this section, shall be
transferred from the highway fund to the legislative
stabilization reserve account on June 30, 2027.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0033
ENROLLED ACT NO. 44, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3